North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-01 Definitions and General Provisions
39-01-01.2.
Autonomous vehicle operations.

As used in this section:

“Automated driving system” means hardware and software collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task for the vehicle on a sustained basis when installed on a motor vehicle and engaged regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain.

“Autonomous vehicle” means a vehicle equipped with an automated driving system.

“Dynamic driving task” means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic within the vehicle’s specific operational design domain, if any, excluding the strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints.

“Human driver” means an individual with a valid license to operate a motor vehicle who manually exercises in-vehicle braking, accelerating, steering, and transmission gear selection input devices to operate a vehicle.

“Minimal risk condition” means a low-risk operating mode in which an autonomous vehicle operating without a human driver achieves a reasonably safe state, such as bringing the vehicle to a complete stop, upon experiencing a failure of the vehicle’s automated driving system that renders the vehicle unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task.

“Operational design domain” means a description of the specific operating domain in which an automated driving system is designed to properly operate, including roadway types, speed range, environmental conditions, and other domain constraints.

An autonomous vehicle must be capable of operating in compliance with all applicable federal and state law, except to the extent exempted under applicable federal or state law, and may operate on the public highways of this state in full compliance with all vehicle registration, title, insurance, and all other applicable requirements under this title.

An autonomous vehicle with automated driving systems engaged does not require a human driver to operate on the public highway if the autonomous vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk condition in case a system failure occurs which renders the automated driving system unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to the vehicle’s intended operational design domain.

An individual using an autonomous vehicle is not driving or in actual physical control of the autonomous vehicle and, therefore, is exempt from licensing requirements if:

The automated driving system is completing the entire dynamic driving task; and

The autonomous vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk condition if a system failure occurs that renders the automated driving system unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to the vehicle’s intended operational design domain.

This section may not be construed to modify, limit, or restrict any statutory provision affecting liability, including chapter 26.1-40, 26.1-41, 28-01.3, 32-03.2, or 39-16.1.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 302, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

39-01-02.
Motor vehicles owned or leased by the state to display name on side of vehicles — Exceptions — Penalty.

All motor vehicles owned and operated by the state, except vehicles under the control of the central vehicle management system and the official vehicle for use by the governor, must have displayed on each front door the words NORTH DAKOTA. The words must be in letters four inches [10.16 centimeters] in height. Two and one-half inches [6.35 centimeters] directly below those words there must be printed in letters one and one-half inches [3.81 centimeters] in height the name of the state agency owning or leasing the motor vehicle. The width of the display required by this section must be proportionate to the required height. The color of the lettering must be in clear and sharp contrast to the background. The state auditor shall include in the auditor’s report to the governor and the legislative assembly any instance of noncompliance with this section. The above requirements and the requirements for no smoking signs do not apply to vehicles operated by a state entity that engages in investigatory activities. The central vehicle management system vehicles must display a window decal designed by the director. The state highway patrol and all peace officers of this state shall enforce this section.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 168, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 2976w1, 2976w2; R.C. 1943, § 39-0102; S.L. 1949, ch. 238, § 1; 1955, ch. 238, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0102; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 6; 1963, ch. 266, § 1; 1965, ch. 265, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 416; 1977, ch. 329, § 1; 1983, ch. 160, § 4; 1983, ch. 417, § 1; 1989, ch. 356, § 12; 1991, ch. 28, § 18; 1991, ch. 394, § 1; 1991, ch. 592, § 12; 2013, ch. 282, § 1.

39-01-03.
Motor vehicle owned by the state, North Dakota art museum, or an International Peace Garden not to be used for private use or in political activities.

A person, officer, or employee of the state or of any department, board, bureau, commission, institution, industry, or other agency of the state, or person, officer, or employee of the North Dakota art museum, or of any entity located upon the international boundary line between the United States of America and Canada used and maintained as a memorial to commemorate the long-existing relationship of peace and good will between the people and the governments of the United States of America and Canada and to further international peace among the nations of the world, may not use or drive any motor vehicle belonging to the state or to any department, board, bureau, commission, institution, industry, or other agency of the state, or person, officer, or employee of the North Dakota art museum, or of any entity located upon the international boundary line between the United States of America and Canada used and maintained as a memorial to commemorate the long-existing relationship of peace and good will between the people and the governments of the United States of America and Canada and to further international peace among the nations of the world, for private use, or while engaged in any political activity.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 184, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0103; S.L. 1949, ch. 238, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 39-0103; S.L. 1989, ch. 356, § 13; 2015, ch. 47, § 20, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 47, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Prohibition against public employees engaging in political activities while on duty, see § 44-08-19.

39-01-04.
Political activity defined.

The term “political activity” as used in this chapter includes any form of campaigning or electioneering, such as attending or arranging for political meetings; transporting candidates or workers engaged in campaigning or electioneering; distributing campaign literature, political guide cards, or placards; soliciting or canvassing for campaign funds; transporting electors to the polls on election day; and any other form of political work usually and ordinarily engaged in by state officers and employees during primary and general election campaigns.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 184, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0104.

39-01-05.
Expenses not to be collected by state officers or employees engaged in political activity.

A state officer or employee who uses or drives any privately owned motor vehicle while engaged in political activity may not collect or receive from this state any expense moneys for the use or operation of the motor vehicle while engaged in the political activity. A state officer or employee may not collect or receive any traveling expense reimbursement from this state for any time spent engaging in any political activity.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 184, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 39-0105; S.L. 1977, ch. 420, § 2; 2001, ch. 327, § 1.

39-01-06.
Collecting or receiving expense money wrongfully — Civil action for recovery — Liability of bond.

Any officer or employee who collects or receives any expense moneys in violation of section 39-01-05 is subject to a suit for the recovery of the funds wrongfully collected or received by that person, and if that person’s office or position is bonded by the state bonding fund, such fund also is liable therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 184, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0106.

39-01-07.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter for which another penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 184, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0107; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 417.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see § 12.1-32-01.

General penalty for violation of title, infraction, see § 39-07-06.

39-01-08.
State, political subdivisions, and International Peace Gardens authorized to carry insurance on vehicles — Waiver of immunity to extent only of insurance purchased.

The state or any department, agency, or bureau, as well as any county, city, or other political subdivision including townships, school districts, and park districts, and any entity located upon the international boundary line between the United States of America and Canada used and maintained as a memorial to commemorate the long-existing relationship of peace and good will between the people and the governments of the United States of America and Canada and to further international peace among the nations of the world, using or operating motor vehicles and aircrafts, may carry insurance for their own protection and for the protection of any employees from claims for loss or damage arising out of or by reason of the use or operation of the motor vehicle or aircraft, whether the vehicle or aircraft at the time the loss or damage in question occurred was being operated in a governmental undertaking or otherwise. If a premium savings will result therefrom, the insurance policy may be taken out for more than one year, but in no event beyond a period of five years.

If insurance is purchased pursuant to subsection 1, then the purchaser waives its immunity to suit only to the extent of allowing a determination of liability to the extent of the waiver of the immunity against liability described in subsection 3.

If insurance is purchased pursuant to subsection 1, then the purchaser waives its immunity against liability only to the types of its insurance coverage and only to the extent of the policy limits of the coverage. Provided, the purchaser or its insurance carrier is not liable for claims arising out of the conduct of a ridesharing arrangement, as defined in section 8-02-07.

If any dispute exists concerning the amount or nature of the insurance coverage, the dispute must be tried separately before the main trial determining the claims and damages of the claimant.

This statute confers no right for a claimant to sue the insurer directly.

When liability insurance is carried pursuant to this section or pursuant to section 32-12.1-05, no defense in a negligence action may be raised by the insurance carrier upon the basis of section 39-07-05.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 214, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0108; S.L. 1965, ch. 266, § 1; 1967, ch. 244, § 1; 1969, ch. 334, § 1; 1975, ch. 349, § 3; 1981, ch. 91, § 24; 1981, ch. 131, § 9; 1985, ch. 317, § 65; 1989, ch. 356, § 14.

Cross-References.

Political subdivisions may purchase liability insurance, see § 32-12.1-05.

Collateral References.

What is “motor vehicle” or the like within statute waiving governmental immunity as to operation of such vehicle, 77 A.L.R.2d 945.

Governmental vehicles or their operators, 87 A.L.R.2d 1224.

Coverage and exclusions under liability policy issued to municipal corporation or similar governmental body, 23 A.L.R.3d 1282, 30 A.L.R.5th 699.

39-01-08.1.
Senior citizens group motor vehicle — Availability of coverage under political subdivision policies.

Any political subdivision may provide for the inclusion of buses, vans, or other motor vehicles used by senior citizens groups to transport members in a motor vehicle insurance policy of the political subdivision. The political subdivision may require payment by a senior citizens group for any increase in the premium rate charged to the political subdivision which is attributable to the coverage provided to that senior citizens group. The political subdivision may provide for a payment procedure to require the payment of any premium or premium portion attributable to the coverage provided for the senior citizens group.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 414, § 1.

39-01-08.2.
Senior citizens group motor vehicle — Availability of coverage under state policies.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any insurance policy providing coverage of state-owned motor vehicles must provide, at the request of a senior citizens group prior to the issuance or renewal of the policy, for the inclusion of buses, vans, or other motor vehicles used by the senior citizens group to transport members. The state agency negotiating the insurance policy may require payment by a senior citizens group for any increase in the premium rate charged to the state agency which is attributable to the coverage provided to that senior citizens group. The state agency shall provide by rule for the payment by the senior citizens group of the premium portion attributable to the group’s coverage under the policy. The state agency may refuse to provide coverage to a senior citizens group if the coverage would hinder the ability of or not allow the state to obtain insurance.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 414, § 2.

39-01-09.
Parking meters prohibited.

It is unlawful for the state of North Dakota, its political subdivisions, counties, cities, and the state department of transportation to establish and maintain any mechanical device or devices known as “parking meters”, or by whatever name designated, requiring the deposit therein of coins or tokens for the privilege of parking cars or other vehicles upon the streets and highways in the state of North Dakota. Any and all ordinances and resolutions now existing authorizing the establishment and maintenance of such mechanical devices or parking meters, or by whatever name designated, are hereby declared null and void.

Source:

I.M. June 29, 1948, S.L. 1949, ch. 357, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0109.

39-01-10.
Proof of payment of registration fees and taxes.

The director of the department of transportation may require all owners or operators of motor vehicles using the highways of this state or registered in this state to show proof of the payment of all proper taxes and registration fees upon such motor vehicles.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 1.

39-01-11.
Nonresident motor vehicle user — Service upon.

The use and operation by a resident of this state or that person’s agent, or by a nonresident or that person’s agent, of a motor vehicle upon or over the highways of this state must be deemed an appointment by such resident when that person has been absent from this state continuously for six months or more following an accident or by such nonresident at any time, of the director of the department of transportation of this state to be the person’s true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all legal process in any action or proceeding against the person growing out of the use or operation of the motor vehicle resulting in damages or loss to person or property, whether the damage or loss occurs upon a public highway or upon public or private property, and such use or operation constitutes an agreement that any such process in any action against the person which is so served has the same legal force and effect as if served upon the person personally, or, in case of the person’s death, that such process has the same legal force and effect as if served upon the administrator of the person’s estate. Service of the summons in such case may be made by delivering a copy thereof to the director with a fee of ten dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 174, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 28-0611; S.L. 1951, ch. 202, § 1; 1953, ch. 204, § 1; 1955, ch. 204, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 28-0611; S.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

39-01-12.
Mailing notice to defendant upon service of nonresident motor vehicle user.

Within ten days after service of summons as provided in section 39-01-11, notice of such service together with a copy of the summons and complaint in the action must be sent by the plaintiff to the defendant at the defendant’s last-known address by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested, and proof of such mailing must be attached to the summons.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 174, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 28-0612.

39-01-13.
Director to keep record of process received for nonresident motor vehicle users.

The director shall keep a record of all process served upon the director under the provisions of section 39-01-11. Such record must show the day and hour of service. If any defendant served under section 39-01-11 has made proof of financial responsibility by filing a certificate of insurance coverage, as provided in section 39-16.1-09, the director shall mail a copy of such summons and complaint to the insurance carrier named in such certificate.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 174, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 28-0613; S.L. 1951, ch. 202, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 28-0613; S.L. 1979, ch. 187, § 74; 1979, ch. 405, § 1.

39-01-14.
Protecting rights of defendant served as nonresident motor vehicle user.

When service has been made as provided in section 39-01-11, the court, before entering default judgment, or at any stage of the proceeding, may order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend any action against the defendant.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 174, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 28-0614.

39-01-15.
Parking privileges for mobility impaired — Certificate — Revocation — Continuing appropriation — Penalty. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A mobility-impaired individual who displays prominently upon a motor vehicle parked by that individual or under that individual’s direction and for that individual’s use, the distinguishing certificate specified in subsection 4, license plates issued under section 39-04-10.2, or a disabled veteran plate issued under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 is entitled to courtesy in the parking of the motor vehicle. However, any municipality may prohibit, by ordinance, parking on any highway for the purpose of creating a fire lane or to provide for the accommodation of heavy traffic during morning and afternoon rush hours. The privileges extended to a mobility-impaired individual do not apply on a highway if parking is prohibited.

A mobility-impaired individual as used in this section includes an individual who uses portable oxygen; requires personal assistance or the use of crutches, a wheelchair, or a walker to walk two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without rest; is restricted by cardiac, pulmonary, or vascular disease from walking two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without rest; has a forced expiratory volume of less than one liter for one second or an arterial oxygen tension of less than sixty millimeters of mercury on room air while at rest and is classified III or IV by standards for cardiac disease set by the American heart association; has an orthopedic, neurologic, or other medical condition that makes it impossible for the person to walk two hundred feet [60.96 meters] without assistance or rest; or is a disabled veteran issued a plate under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18.

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 319, § 6.

The director may issue a special identifying certificate to any mobility-impaired applicant upon submission by the applicant of a completed application and a written or electronic statement issued by a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse to the director that the applicant is a mobility-impaired person within the criteria of subsection 2. The director shall waive the requirement for a written or electronic statement from a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse if the applicant has previously submitted an application containing a certification from a qualified physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse that the applicant’s impairment is not reversible. The application must include the information required by the director. The physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s statement must describe how the impairment limits the applicant’s mobility and daily life functions of the applicant. The certificate is valid for a period, not to exceed three years, as determined by the director. A physician, physician assistant, chiropractor, or an advanced practice registered nurse who provides a false statement that an individual is mobility impaired for the purpose of that individual obtaining a certificate under this subsection is guilty of an infraction for which a minimum fine of one hundred dollars must be imposed. A certificate issued under this subsection must be nine and one-half inches [24.13 centimeters] in height and three inches [7.62 centimeters] in width and must bear, in white on blue, the internationally accepted symbol of access for the mobility impaired. The certificate must bear the expiration date and registration number assigned by the director. The director shall adopt rules governing the issuance of the certificate. A temporary certificate, valid for an initial period not to exceed three months, may be issued by the director for a fee of three dollars upon application supported by a physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or an advanced practice registered nurse’s statement. The director may issue a maximum of one additional temporary certificate for a fee of three dollars. The temporary certificate may be extended an additional period, not to exceed three months, upon application supported by a physician’s, physician assistant’s, chiropractor’s, or an advanced practice registered nurse’s statement that the extension is warranted. Temporary certificates must be the same size as other certificates issued under this section and must be white on red. The director may issue a maximum of one additional certificate, if the applicant does not have number plates issued under section 39-04-10.2 or under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18, to a mobility-impaired individual to whom a certificate has been issued under this subsection. The additional certificates may only be used by or on behalf of the mobility-impaired individual.

Except as provided in this subsection, two dollars of each fee for issuance of a certificate and one dollar of each fee for issuance of an additional certificate under this section must be deposited in the state highway department fund for purposes of defraying the cost of issuing the certificate. The rest of the fee, and the five dollar fee received for the issuance of an additional certificate under subsection 4, must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state rehabilitation council fund. The fees deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated on a continuing basis to the department of human services for use by the state rehabilitation council to accomplish the council’s statutory duties provided under section 50-06.1-16. If a certificate is lost, mutilated, or destroyed, the individual to whom the certificate was issued is entitled to a replacement. The individual shall furnish proof satisfactory to the director that the certificate has been lost, mutilated, or destroyed, and shall pay a replacement fee of three dollars.

A certificate issued under this section must be hung from the rearview mirror of the motor vehicle whenever the vehicle is occupying a space reserved for the mobility impaired and is being used by a mobility-impaired individual or another individual for the purposes of transporting the mobility-impaired individual. No part of the certificate may be obscured. A fee of five dollars may be imposed for a violation of this subsection.

An applicant may appeal a decision denying issuance of the certificate to the director. Written notice of the appeal must be received within ten business days following receipt by the applicant of notice of denial. The applicant has sixty days to provide additional supportive material to the director for purposes of deciding the appeal. The director shall affirm or reverse the decision to deny issuance of the certificate within thirty days after receipt of the supportive material. Written notice of the decision must be given to the applicant.

If a law enforcement officer finds that the certificate is being improperly used, the officer may report to the director any violation and the director may, in the director’s discretion, remove the privilege. An individual who is not mobility impaired and who exercises the privileges granted a mobility-impaired individual under subsection 1 is guilty of an infraction for which a fine of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

If a public or private entity designates parking spaces for accessible parking, the spaces must comply with the requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Accessibility Guidelines for Buildings and Facilities as contained in the appendix to title 28, Code of Federal Regulations, part 36 [28 CFR 36] and must be indicated by blue paint on the curb or edge of the paved portion of the street or parking lot adjacent to the space. In addition to blue paint, each reserved space must be indicated by a sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired. The sign must indicate that unauthorized use of the space is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

For any event, a public or a private entity temporarily may reserve additional accessible parking spaces for use by motor vehicles operated by a mobility-impaired individual. In that case, each temporarily reserved space must be indicated by a sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired at least four hours before the event.

A parking space clearly identified as reserved for the mobility impaired is considered designated and reserved for the mobility impaired and is sufficient basis for the enforcement of this section if the parking space has two of the following requirements:

Blue paint on the curb or edge of the paved portion of the street or parking lot adjacent to the space;

A sign bearing the international symbol of accessibility for the mobility impaired; or

Notice that unauthorized use of the space is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed.

Except for a temporarily reserved parking space for the mobility impaired, a sign posted must be immovable.

A law enforcement officer shall enforce this section in any parking lot or parking facility, whether publicly or privately owned.

If the designated parking spaces for mobility-impaired individuals are occupied or inaccessible, a motor vehicle displaying the distinguishing certificate specified in subsection 4, license plates issued under section 39-04-10.2, or a disabled veteran plate issued under subdivision j of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 may park at an angle and occupy two standard parking spaces.

An individual may not stop, stand, or park any vehicle in any designated parking space that is reserved for the mobility impaired unless the vehicle displays a mobility-impaired identification certificate issued by the director to a mobility-impaired individual. A mobility-impaired individual may not permit the use of a certificate issued under this section by an individual who is not mobility impaired when that use is not in connection with the transport of the mobility-impaired individual. The registered owner of a vehicle may not allow that vehicle to be used in a manner that violates this subsection. Proof of intent is not required to prove a registered owner’s violation of this subsection. The registered owner, however, may be excused from a violation if the owner provides the citing authority with the name and address of the individual operating the vehicle at the time of the violation. A vehicle may temporarily use a space reserved for a mobility-impaired individual without a mobility-impaired certificate for the purpose of loading and unloading a mobility-impaired individual. A violation of this subsection is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of one hundred dollars must be imposed. Notwithstanding section 29-27-02.1, fifty percent of the fee imposed and collected under this subsection is appropriated on a continuing basis to the state rehabilitation council for the development of competitive and integrated employment opportunities.

A motor vehicle licensed in another state which displays a special authorized vehicle designation issued by the licensing authority of that state for vehicles used in the transportation of a mobility-impaired individual must be accorded the same privilege provided in this section for similar vehicles licensed in this state if the laws of the other state provide the same privileges to North Dakota motor vehicles displaying the special identifying certificate authorized in this section.

An entity that violates the requirements of subsection 9 is guilty of an infraction if the entity does not comply with subsection 9 within sixty days after receiving official notification of the violation.

The department shall issue a mobility-impaired parking permit for a vehicle owned and operated by care providers licensed by the state, veterans-related organizations, and other entities that regularly transport mobility-impaired individuals for use by those providers and entities to park in designated parking spaces while transporting mobility-impaired individuals.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 293, §§ 1 to 4; 1975, ch. 106, § 418; 1977, ch. 330, § 1; 1979, ch. 406, § 1; 1981, ch. 379, § 1; 1987, ch. 441, § 1; 1989, ch. 319, §§ 2, 6; 1989, ch. 443, § 1; 1991, ch. 395, § 1; 1991, ch. 396, § 1; 1993, ch. 261, § 2; 1993, ch. 376, § 1; 1995, ch. 363, § 1; 1995, ch. 458, § 1; 2001, ch. 328, § 1; 2005, ch. 322, § 1; 2013, ch. 283, § 1; 2013, ch. 373, § 1; 2015, ch. 258, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 335, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 257, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 303, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 304, §§
1, 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 258, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39-01-15 was amended 3 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Sections 1 and 2 of Chapter 304, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1135; and Section 1 of Chapter 303, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2119.

Section 39-01-15 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 257, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1211; and Section 1 of Chapter 335, Session Laws 2017 House Bill 1135.